Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.060

State ferry system, which chapter governs.

For any matter concerning the state ferry system and employee relations, collective bargaining, or labor disputes or stoppages, the provisions of this chapter and chapter 47.64 RCW shall govern. However, if a conflict exists between this chapter and chapter 47.64 RCW, this chapter shall govern.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 18; 1983 c 15 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 16 ss 16-25: "Sections 16 through 25 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2011." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 31.]

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions—2011 1st sp.s. c 16: "(1) Consistent with *RCW 41.58.065, the marine employees' commission's powers, duties, and functions are transferred to the public employment relations commission.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the marine employees' commission shall be delivered to the custody of the public employment relations commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the marine employees' commission shall be made available to the public employment relations commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the marine employees' commission shall be assigned to the public employment relations commission.

(b) Any appropriations made to the marine employees' commission shall, on July 1, 2011, be transferred and credited to the public employment relations commission.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All pending business before the marine employees' commission shall be continued and acted upon by the public employment relations commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the public employment relations commission.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the marine employees' commission shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2011.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 23.]

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.58.065 expired June 30, 2013.